Oklahoma, session 2025, SB656.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 2-101, is
amended to read as follows:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB656 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Section 2-101. The A. Until July 1, 2027, the State Election
Board shall be composed of three (3) members and two (2) alternate
members, each of whom shall be appointed by the Governor upon advice
and consent of the Senate. An alternate shall serve on the State
Election Board at any meeting that a member for whom the person is
an alternate is unable to attend. Any person serving as a member or
alternate member of the State Election Board on the effective date
of this act shall continue to serve in his or her position until
July 1, 2027.
B. Beginning July 1, 2027, the State Election Board shall be
composed of five (5) members, each of whom shall be appointed
pursuant to the provisions of Section 2-101.1 of this title.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 2-101.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-101.1. A. Beginning July 1, 2027, the State Election
Board shall consist of the following members:
1. One member who is a registered voter of this state appointed
by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
2. One member who is a registered voter of this state appointed
by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and
3. Three members appointed by the Governor, subject to the
advice and consent of the Senate, as follows:
a. one member from the list provided pursuant to
subsection C of this section who is a registered voter
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB656 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

of the political party with the largest number of
registered voters in this state based on the latest
January 15 voter registration report,
b. one member from the list provided pursuant to
subsection C of this section who is a registered voter
of the political party with the second largest number
of registered voters in this state based on the latest
January 15 voter registration report, and
c. one member who is a registered voter of this state but
who is not a registered voter of either of the two
political parties with the largest number of
registered voters in this state.
B. A majority of the State Election Board shall constitute a
quorum, and action taken by a majority of members voting at any
meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the action of the
Board.
C. 1. No later than March 1, 2015 January 31, 2027, and every
four (4) years thereafter, the state central committee of the
recognized political party parties having the largest and second
largest number of registered voters, based upon the latest January
15 registration report, shall submit to the Governor a list of ten
(10) nominees for membership on the State Election Board, and the
state central committee of the political party having the second
largest number of registered voters, based upon the latest January
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB656 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

15 r egistration report, shall submit to the Governor a list of ten
(10) nominees for membership on the State Election Board. The list
of nominees shall be signed by a majority of the members of the
state central committee, whose signatures shall be notarized by a
notary public.
The Governor shall be confined to the lists of names submitted
by each party and shall appoint two (2) members and one (1)
alternate member of the State Election Board from one political
party and one (1) member and one (1) alternate member of the State
Election Board from the other political party.
2. For the purposes of this title, a political party’s state
central committee shall consist of the party’s chair, vice chair,
national committeeman and national committeewoman, or the equivalent
position under the party’s rules.
3. Appointments shall be made by the Governor and submitted to
the Senate no later than March 15, 2015 March 1, 2027, and every
four (4) years thereafter. Provided, for appointments to be made in
2011, such submissions shall be provided to the Governor within five
(5) business days of the effective date of this act and such
appointments shall be made by the Governor within ten (10) business
days of the effective date of this act.
4. Appointments shall be made by the President Pro Tempore of
the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives no later
than June 1, 2027, and every four (4) years thereafter.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB656 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. The terms of the State Election Board members appointed in
the manner described in this section shall begin on July 1, 2027,
and shall be for a period of four (4) years. Provided, a member
whose term has expired shall continue to serve until a successor is
lawfully appointed and confirmed, if applicable.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 2-101.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-101.2. In the event of a vacancy of a State Election
Board member created by death or, removal, change of political party
affiliation, resignation, or any other reason provided by law, the
vacancy shall be filled within thirty (30) days in the same manner
as the member was appointed. If the Governor was the appointing
authority, he or she shall, within thirty (30) days after such
vacancy occurs, appoint, upon with the advice and consent of the
Senate, a member of the same party to fill the unexpired term from a
list of five (5) nominees submitted by the party’s state central
committee within fifteen (15) days after said the vacancy occurs.
If the vacancy occurs for the member who is not affiliated with
either of the two political parties with the largest number of
registered voters in this state, the Governor shall make the
appointment, with the advice and consent of the Senate, from the
registered voters in this state.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 2-101.3, is
amended to read as follows:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB656 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Section 2-101.3. Should If a state central committee fail fails
to submit nominees in the manner and within the period prescribed,
the Governor shall make his the appointment from within the ranks of
said the party.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 2-101.6, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-101.6. The A. 1. Until January 1, 2026, the
Secretary of the Senate shall serve as Secretary of the State
Election Board at a salary established annually by the Legislature.
However, the On January 1, 2026, the position of Secretary of the
State Election Board shall be vacant. To fill such vacancy, a
person shall be appointed by the State Election Board with the
advice and consent of the Senate to serve the remainder of the term
vacated pursuant to this subsection.
2. Beginning on January 1, 2027, and every four (4) years
thereafter, the Secretary of the State Election Board shall be
appointed by the State Election Board with the advice and consent of
the Senate for a term of four (4) years.
B. 1. In the event of a vacancy in the position of the
Secretary of the State Election Board, the assistant secretary of
the State Election Board employed by the Secretary as authorized
pursuant to Section 2-107 of this title shall serve as Acting
Secretary and shall perform the duties of the Secretary until the
vacancy is filled in the manner provided by this section.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB656 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. To fill a vacancy in the position of the Secretary of the
State Election Board, a person shall be appointed by the State
Election Board with the advice and consent of the Senate.
C. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall not be a
member of the State Election Board. Beginning on January 1, 2026,
the salary of the Secretary shall be established by the Board.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 2-101.7, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-101.7. On the first Monday in April, 1983 No later
than July 15, 2027, and every four (4) years thereafter, the State
Election Board shall meet upon the call of the Secretary of the
State Election Board to seat newly appointed board members and to
elect a Chairman and Vice Chairman chair and vice chair. Terms of
the Chairman, Vice Chairman and member shall begin at that time.
SECTION 7. REPEALER 26 O.S. 2021, Section 2-101.5, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 8. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
February 25, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS






SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB656 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)